Colorado, session 2026A, HB1130.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 5.9 to title
9 as follows:
ARTICLE 5.9
Baby Diaper Changing Stations in Restrooms Accessible to the
Public
9-5.9-101. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 5.9, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "BABY DIAPER CHANGING STATION" MEANS A SAFE, SANITARY,
-2- 1130

AND CONVENIENT BABY DIAPER CHANGING TABLE.
(2) "CERTIFIED HISTORIC STRUCTURE" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS
IN SECTION 9-5.7-102 (2).
(3) "GENDER-SPECIFIC RESTROOM" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS IN
SECTION 9-5.7-102 (3).
(4) "NON-GENDERED MULTI-STALL RESTROOM" HAS THE SAME
MEANING AS IN SECTION 9-5.7-102 (5).
(5) "NON-GENDERED SINGLE-STALL RESTROOM" HAS THE SAME
MEANING AS IN SECTION 9-5.7-102 (6).
(6) "PUBLIC ENTITY" MEANS A STATE DEPARTMENT OR STATE
AGENCY, STATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 23-18-102 (10), A COUNTY, A CITY AND COUNTY, OR A
MUNICIPALITY. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 5.9, A STATE AGENCY DOES
NOT INCLUDE A BUILDING OWNED AND OPERATED AS AN EDUCATION
FACILITY MANAGED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OR A SCHOOL
DISTRICT, CHARTER SCHOOL, OR INSTITUTE CHARTER SCHOOL.
(7) "RESTROOM" MEANS A GENDER-SPECIFIC RESTROOM, A
NON-GENDERED MULTI-STALL RESTROOM, OR A NON-GENDERED
SINGLE-STALL RESTROOM.
(8) "RESTROOM ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC" MEANS ANY INDOOR
RESTROOM THAT IS OPEN TO THE PUBLIC, INCLUDING TO CUSTOMERS OR
PUBLIC VISITORS, BUT DOES NOT INCLUDE RESTROOMS PRIMARILY SERVING
PRIVATE OFFICES OR WORKSPACES OR THAT ARE GENERALLY NOT OPEN TO
CUSTOMERS OR PUBLIC VISITORS.
(9) "SMALL BUSINESS" MEANS AN EMPLOYER WITH TWENTY-FIVE
OR FEWER EMPLOYEES THAT GENERATES NO MORE THAN THREE MILLION
FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS IN ANNUAL GROSS INCOME.
-3- 1130

9-5.9-102. Restrooms - baby diaper changing stations -
applicability - enforcement.
(1) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2028, THE OWNER OR MANAGER OF A
BUILDING WITH A RESTROOM ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC SHALL:
(a) PROVIDE BABY DIAPER CHANGING STATIONS IN RESTROOMS
ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC AS FOLLOWS:
(I) AT LEAST ONE BABY DIAPER CHANGING STATION IN ONE
RESTROOM DESIGNATED FOR EACH GENDER ON EACH FLOOR;
(II) AT LEAST ONE BABY DIAPER CHANGING STATION IN A
NON-GENDERED SINGLE-STALL RESTROOM ON EACH FLOOR; OR
(III) AT LEAST ONE BABY DIAPER CHANGING STATION IN A
NON-GENDERED MULTI-STALL RESTROOM ON EACH FLOOR; AND
(b) ENSURE THAT EACH BABY DIAPER CHANGING STATION IS
CLEANED WITH THE SAME FREQUENCY AS THE RESTROOM IN WHICH IT IS
LOCATED AND MAINTAINED, REPAIRED, AND REPLACED AS NECESSARY TO
ENSURE SAFETY AND EASE OF USE.

(2) SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A
BUILDING WITH A RESTROOM ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC IF:
(a) THE INSTALLATION OF A BABY DIAPER CHANGING STATION IN A
RESTROOM ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC WOULD RESULT IN A FAILURE TO
COMPLY WITH THE "AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT OF 1990", 42
U.S.C. SEC. 12101 ET SEQ., OR OTHER APPLICABLE BUILDING STANDARDS
GOVERNING THE RIGHT OF ACCESS FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES;
(b) THE BUILDING IS DESIGNATED AS A CERTIFIED HISTORIC
STRUCTURE;
(c) THE BUILDING IS OWNED OR MANAGED BY A PUBLIC ENTITY;
-4- 1130

(d) THE BUILDING IS OWNED OR MANAGED BY A SMALL BUSINESS
AND HAS AN OCCUPANCY OF LESS THAN TWENTY-FIVE PEOPLE; OR
(e) A PORTION OF THE BUILDING IS OCCUPIED BY A BUSINESS THAT
DOES NOT ADMIT INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE UNDER TWENTY-ONE YEARS OLD,
BUT ONLY WITH RESPECT TO THAT PORTION OF THE BUILDING.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- 1130